Utah statutes.
26-7-2.   Center for Multicultural Health -- Duties.
(1)  As used in this section, "multicultural and minority health issues" means
health, including mental and oral health, issues of particular interest to
cultural, ethnic, racial, or other subpopulations, including:
(a)  disparities in:
(i)  disease incidence, prevalence, morbidity, mortality, treatment, and
treatment response; and
(ii)  access to care; and
(b)  cultural competency in the delivery of health care.
(2)  There is created within the department the Center for Multicultural
Health.
(3)  The Center for Multicultural Health shall:
(a)  promote and coordinate the research, data production and dissemination,
education, and health promotion activities of the department, local health
departments, local mental health authorities, public schools, community-based
organizations, Indian tribes, and other organizations within the state as they
relate to multicultural and minority health issues;
(b)  assist in the development and implementation of programs to address
multicultural and minority health issues;
(c)  promote the dissemination and use of information on multicultural and
minority health issues by minority populations, health care providers, and
others;
(d)  seek federal funding and other resources to accomplish its mission;
(e)  provide technical assistance to entities within the state seeking funding
to study or address multicultural and minority health issues;
(f)  develop and increase the capacity of the center to:
(i)  ensure the delivery of qualified timely culturally appropriate
translation services across all department programs; and
(ii)  provide, where appropriate, linguistically competent translation and
communication services for limited English proficiency individuals;
(g)  provide staff assistance to any advisory committee created by the
department to study multicultural and minority health issues; and
(h)  annually report to the Legislature on its activities and accomplishments.
